Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-2102
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections
66-2101 to 66-2107:

(1) City means
a city of the first or second class or village;

(2) Jurisdictional utility
has the same meaning as in section 66-1802;

(3) Natural gas pipeline facility means
a pipeline, pump, compressor, or storage or other facility, structure, or
property necessary, useful, or incidental in the transportation of natural
gas; and

(4) Rural infrastructure development means planning, financing,
development, acquisition, construction, owning, operating, and maintaining
a natural gas pipeline facility or entering into agreements with an interstate
pipeline for existing, new, or expanded capacity on the interstate pipeline's
system for the transportation of natural gas necessary to supply unserved
or underserved areas; and

(5) Unserved or underserved area means an area in this state lacking
adequate natural gas pipeline capacity to meet the demand of existing or potential
end-use customers as determined by the jurisdictional utility presently serving
the area. Unserved or underserved area does not include any area within a
city of the primary or metropolitan class.

Laws 2012, LB1115, § 2.